Utah statutes.
11-13-219.   Publication of resolutions or agreements -- Contesting legality of resolution or agreement.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Enactment" means:

(i)  a resolution adopted or proceedings taken by a governing body under the authority of this chapter, and includes a resolution, indenture, or other instrument providing for the issuance of bonds; and

(ii)  an agreement or other instrument that is authorized, executed, or approved by a governing body under the authority of this chapter.

(b)  "Governing body" means:

(i)  the legislative body of a public agency; and

(ii)  the governing body of an interlocal entity created under this chapter.

(c)  "Notice of bonds" means the notice authorized by Subsection (3)(d).

(d)  "Notice of agreement" means the notice authorized by Subsection (3)(c).

(e)  "Official newspaper" means the newspaper selected by a governing body under Subsection (4)(b) to publish its enactments.

(2)  Any enactment taken or made under the authority of this chapter is not subject to referendum.

(3) (a)  A governing body need not publish any enactment taken or made under the authority of this chapter.

(b)  A governing body may provide for the publication of any enactment taken or made by it under the authority of this chapter according to the publication requirements established by this section.

(c) (i)  If the enactment is an agreement, document, or other instrument, or a resolution or other proceeding authorizing or approving an agreement, document, or other instrument, the governing body may, instead of publishing the full text of the agreement, resolution, or other proceeding, publish a notice of agreement containing:

(A)  the names of the parties to the agreement;

(B)  the general subject matter of the agreement;

(C)  the term of the agreement;

(D)  a description of the payment obligations, if any, of the parties to the agreement; and

(E)  a statement that the resolution and agreement will be available for review at the governing body's principal place of business during regular business hours for 30 days after the publication of the notice of agreement.

(ii)  The governing body shall make a copy of the resolution or other proceeding and a copy of the contract available at its principal place of business during regular business hours for 30 days after the publication of the notice of agreement.

(d)  If the enactment is a resolution or other proceeding authorizing the issuance of bonds, the governing body may, instead of publishing the full text of the resolution or other proceeding and the documents pertaining to the issuance of bonds, publish a notice of bonds that contains the information described in Subsection 11-14-316(2).

(4) (a)  If the governing body chooses to publish an enactment, notice of bonds, or notice of agreement, the governing body shall comply with the requirements of this Subsection (4).

(b)  If there is more than one newspaper of general circulation, or more than one newspaper, published within the boundaries of the governing body, the governing body may designate one of those newspapers as the official newspaper for all publications made under this section.

(c) (i) (A)  The governing body shall publish the enactment, notice of bonds, or notice of agreement in:

(I)  the official newspaper;

(II)  the newspaper published in the municipality in which the principal office of the governmental entity is located; or

(III)  if no newspaper is published in that municipality, in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality; and

(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(ii)  The governing body may publish the enactment, notice of bonds, or notice of agreement:

(A) (I)  in a newspaper of general circulation; or

(II)  in a newspaper that is published within the boundaries of any public agency that is a party to the enactment or agreement; and

(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(5) (a)  Any person in interest may contest the legality of an enactment or any action performed or instrument issued under the authority of the enactment for 30 days after the publication of the enactment, notice of bonds, or notice of agreement.

(b)  After the 30 days have passed, no one may contest the regularity, formality, or legality of the enactment or any action performed or instrument issued under the authority of the enactment for any cause whatsoever.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

